Louisiana, session 2026, SB99.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 30:2022(A)(1), 2050.1(B)(2)(a), 2050.3(B)(3), 2075.2(B), 2116,
2162(A)(2), 2181, 2195.9(A)(6), 2250, and 2286.1(A)(2) are hereby amended and reenacted
to read as follows:
§2022. Permit applications and variance requests; notification
A.(1) Any person seeking a permit, license, registration, variance, or LPDES
variance shall file a an electronic or written application for such with the secretary.
Excluding applications relative to medical and dental devices, the secretary shall
promptly send a notice of the subject matter of each application to the governing
authority of the parish affected by the application and any public interest group or
individual within the affected parish who has requested notice electronically or in
writing and provided a mailing address or email address. The notice of a permit,
Page 1 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 99 ENROLLED
license, or registration application shall be provided within thirty days after receipt
of the application. The parish governing authority shall promptly notify each
municipality within said parish affected by the application. Electronic transmission
of notice pursuant to this Section shall have the same force and effect as notice
provided by mail or certified mail.
* * *
§2050.1. Enforcement; policies; list; legal review
* * *
B.(1) * * *
(2)(a) On a periodic basis, the secretary shall mail, including by electronic
mail, a copy of the list, either separately or as part of a department publication, to
persons who request that they be placed on the mailing list. Electronic transmission
of notice pursuant to this Section shall have the same force and effect as notice
provided by mail or certified mail.
* * *
§2050.3. Enforcement; notice of violation; penalties
* * *
B.(1) * * *
* * *
(3) Written comments or electronically submitted comments may be filed
with the assistant secretary regarding the alleged violation and a possible penalty.
* * *
§2075.2. Sewage treatment facility; privately owned; surety required; nonfunctional
system
* * *
B. If the treatment facility is to be acquired by a homeowners' association, by
act of sale or donation, for operation and maintenance, the original permittee must
submit the legal name of the association, with one person as "environmental contact"
for any matter relating to the treatment plant. The permittee shall also include the
current mailing address, and telephone number, and an electronic mail address for
Page 2 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 99 ENROLLED
the environmental contact, which shall be submitted to the department at least sixty
days prior to legal transfer of the facility.
* * *
§2116. Naturally occurring radioactive material
On and after July 1, 1995, the secretary, upon receipt of an application for
any commercial facility seeking a specific license for the treatment, storage, or
disposal of naturally occurring radioactive material shall promptly notify the
governing authority of any parish affected by the application and any public interest
group or individual within the affected parish who has requested notice in writing or
electronically and provided a mailing address or email address. The parish
governing authority shall promptly notify each municipality within said parish
affected by the application. The secretary shall promptly consider such application
and take such action thereon as he deems appropriate in accordance with law;
however, the failure by the secretary or the parish governing authority to give the
notice required by this Section shall not affect the validity of the action taken on the
application. For the purposes of this Subsection, "any public interest group within
the affected parish" shall mean any association having not less than twenty-five
members who reside in the parish in which the relevant facility is or will be located.
Electronic transmission of notice pursuant to this Section shall have the same
force and effect as notice provided by mail or certified mail.
* * *
§2162. Solid waste capacity
A.(1) * * *
(2) In performing such evaluations, the secretary shall determine the
permitted capacity that is available to safely manage the solid waste. After each such
determination, the secretary shall submit a report to the House Committee on Natural
Resources and Environment and the Senate Committee on Environmental Quality
and shall make such determination available to the public through public notification
and the department mail list, including an email list. Electronic transmission of
notice pursuant to this Section shall have the same force and effect as notice
Page 3 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 99 ENROLLED
provided by mail or certified mail.
* * *
§2181. Notice to legislators
The assistant secretary for the office of environmental services shall send a
list of the applications for hazardous waste permits and a list of the hazardous waste
permits that have been granted to each member of the legislative committees on
natural resources and the environment in the Louisiana House of Representatives and
the Louisiana Senate Committee on Environmental Quality and the House
Committee on Natural Resources and Environment, and to each member of the
legislature in whose district a facility that has applied for or been granted a
hazardous waste permit is located. The lists shall be mailed or electronically
transmitted monthly to their district offices and shall include the nature of the
permit, the dates of application or granting, the person or company affected, and the
parish of the location of the facility subject to the permit. However, the failure of the
assistant secretary to provide the list required by this Section shall not affect the
validity of the action taken on the applications or permits. Electronic transmission
of the list pursuant to this Section shall have the same force and effect as
mailing.
* * *
§2195.9. Financial responsibility
A. The financial responsibility requirements for taking response actions and
third-party judgments by motor fuel underground storage tank owners who are
eligible participants in the Tank Trust Account are hereby established as follows:
* * *
(6) A lien filed by the department with the same ranking and privilege as that
authorized by R.S. 30:2195(F)(2) may be substituted for the financial responsibility
requirement of this Section, but in no case shall the lien be substituted on behalf of
an owner or operator who continues to operate the system. The department shall
promulgate regulations to provide for the use of this lien that ensures the fiscal
stability of the account. Such regulations shall provide that the use of the funds in the
Page 4 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 99 ENROLLED
Tank Trust Account in any fiscal year on sites for which the lien authorized by this
Section has been used to substitute for the financial responsibility amount shall not
exceed twenty percent of the amounts collected in the previous fiscal year. The
secretary is authorized to exceed the twenty percent limitation contained in this
Paragraph upon recommendation of the Motor Fuels Underground Storage Tank
Trust Fund Advisory Board. Upon recommendation of the board to exceed the
twenty percent limitation as provided for in this Paragraph, the secretary shall send
written notice to the Senate Committee on Environmental Quality and the House
Committee on Natural Resources and Environment listing the project name, project
location, and the amount of the project that exceeds the twenty percent limitation.
Electronic transmission of written notice pursuant to this Section shall have the
same force and effect as notice provided by mail or certified mail.
* * *
§2250. Notice of determination of tax imposed
Upon determining the tax imposed on each disposer or generator of
hazardous waste in Louisiana, the secretary shall mail a provide, by mail or
electronic transmission, written notice of such determination to each disposer or
generator and to the secretary of the Department of Revenue, setting out the amount
of tax imposed on the disposer or generator, the fact that the notice is being mailed
to the Department of Revenue, and the fact that the amount of tax in the written
notice will be due on January 1, 1985, and that the secretary of the Department of
Revenue will proceed to collect the tax on that date. Electronic transmission of
notice pursuant to this Section shall have the same force and effect as notice
provided by mail or certified mail.
* * *
§2286.1. Submission and approval of voluntary remedial action plans
A. * * *
* * *
(2) Within ninety days of receipt of the remedial investigation work plan, the
department shall review the plan and either approve such plan or provide written
Page 5 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 99 ENROLLED
notices of deficiencies in the investigation work plan. Electronic transmission of
the written notices of deficiencies pursuant to this Section shall have the same
force and effect as notice provided by mail or certified mail.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 6 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.